New York, session 2025-2026, A4547.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 210-d 2 to read as follows: 3 § 210-d. Registration of curricula. 1. Notwithstanding any law, rule 4 or regulation to the contrary, any new curriculum or program of study 5 offered by any not-for-profit college or university chartered by the 6 regents or incorporated by special act of the legislature that does not 7 require a master plan amendment pursuant to section two hundred thirty- 8 seven of this part, charter amendment pursuant to section two hundred 9 sixteen of this part, or lead to professional licensure, and that is 10 approved by the state university board of trustees, the city university 11 board of trustees, or the trustees or governing body of any other not- 12 for-profit college or university chartered by the regents which (a) has 13 maintained a physical presence in the state for the immediately preced- 14 ing ten years and has been operated continuously by the same governing 15 body during the same immediately preceding ten-year period, and is 16 accredited and has continued its accreditation by the Middle States 17 Commission on Higher Education or another institutional accrediting 18 agency recognized by the secretary of the United States department of 19 education or the department for the immediately preceding ten years, or 20 (b) notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subdivision, meets the defi- 21 nition of a highly qualified out of state institution pursuant to EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01568-03-6 A. 4547--A 2 1 3.59(f) of the commissioner's rules and regulations and has received 2 approval for a charter by the regents and approval of a petition to 3 merge with a chartered New York state institution that has maintained a 4 physical presence in the state for the immediately preceding ten-year 5 period prior to the merger, shall be deemed registered with the depart- 6 ment forty-five days after notification of approval by such college or 7 university's governing body and submission of a complete application for 8 review. If within forty-five days of submission, the department deter- 9 mines the new curriculum or program of study to be incomplete or insuf- 10 ficient, a written explanation shall be provided to the institution. 11 Upon curing, the new curriculum or program of study shall be deemed 12 registered with the department thirty days after resubmission, or earli- 13 er upon the department's approval. 14 2. Any not-for-profit college or university that meets the criteria 15 set forth in subdivision one of this section which has received curric- 16 ulum or program approval from the department and seeks to offer the same 17 curriculum or program in a distance learning format shall not need to 18 have such curriculum or program re-approved by the department, but shall 19 inform the department of such college's or university's intent to offer 20 such program in such format within thirty days prior to providing 21 distance learning. 22 3. If a college or university is placed on probation or has its 23 accreditation terminated by the institutional accrediting agency, such 24 college or university shall notify the regents in writing no later than 25 thirty days after receiving notice of its probationary status or loss of 26 accreditation by the institutional accrediting agency. 27 4. Any college or university which has its accreditation placed on 28 probation or terminated by the institutional accrediting agency or the 29 education department shall be subject to the commissioner's program 30 approval until it has been removed from probation or regained accredi- 31 tation by the institutional accrediting agency or the education depart- 32 ment, and shall further remain subject to such commissioner's program 33 approval until it has continued without probation for a period of not 34 less than six years. 35 5. If a college or university subject to this section intends to offer 36 or institute an additional degree or program which constitutes a 37 substantive change as defined and determined by the institutional 38 accrediting agency, then such college or university shall provide the 39 commissioner with copies of any reports or other documents filed with 40 the institutional accrediting agency as part of the institutional 41 accrediting agency's substantive change review process and shall inform 42 the commissioner when the substantive change is approved. 43 6. Any such college or university that does not satisfy all of the 44 provisions of this section shall comply with the procedures and criteria 45 established by the regents and commissioner for academic program 46 approval. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit the depart- 47 ment's existing authority to investigate a complaint concerning the 48 institution, or any program offered, including the authority to deregis- 49 ter the program. 50 7. The commissioner shall establish and maintain a database, accessi- 51 ble to institutions seeking curriculum or program approval, which shall 52 provide updated information on the current status of an institution's 53 submitted requests. To the extent practicable, the database shall 54 include, but is not limited to, the following information: 55 (a) acknowledgement and date of receipt of submission; A. 4547--A 3 1 (b) the initial review by an office of college and university evalu- 2 ation; 3 (c) questions from the department to the specific institution and 4 receipt of answers provided by the institution in response; and 5 (d) any remarks and the final decision made by the department regard- 6 ing a curriculum's or program's approval or disapproval. 7 8. The commissioner is hereby authorized to promulgate rules and regu- 8 lations necessary for the implementation of this section. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 10 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment 11 and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation 12 of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 13 completed on or before such effective date.